Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201353-117
Powers, functions, and duties.

The commission has the following powers, functions, and duties:

(1) To receive applications for and to issue licenses to and suspend,
cancel, and revoke licenses of manufacturers, wholesalers, nonbeverage users,
retailers, railroads including owners and lessees of sleeping, dining, and
cafe cars, airlines, and boats in accordance with the Nebraska Liquor Control
Act;

(2) To fix by rules and regulations the standards of manufacture of
alcoholic liquor not inconsistent with federal laws in order to insure the
use of proper ingredients and methods in the manufacture and distribution
thereof and to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations not inconsistent
with federal laws for the proper labeling of containers, barrels, casks, or
other bulk containers or of bottles of alcoholic liquor manufactured or sold
in this state. The Legislature intends, by the grant of power to adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations, that the commission have broad discretionary
powers to govern the traffic in alcoholic liquor and to enforce strictly all
provisions of the act in the interest of sanitation, purity of products, truthful
representations, and honest dealings in a manner that generally will promote
the public health and welfare. All such rules and regulations shall be absolutely
binding upon all licensees and enforceable by the commission through the power
of suspension or cancellation of licenses, except that all rules and regulations
of the commission affecting a club possessing any form of retail license shall
have equal application to all such licenses or shall be void;

(3) To call upon other administrative departments of the state, county
and municipal governments, county sheriffs, city police departments, village
marshals, peace officers, and prosecuting officers for such information and
assistance as the commission deems necessary in the performance of its duties. The commission shall enter into an agreement
with the Nebraska State Patrol in which the Nebraska State Patrol shall hire
six new patrol officers and, from the entire Nebraska State Patrol, shall
designate a minimum of six patrol officers who will spend a majority of their
time in administration and enforcement of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act;

(4) To recommend to local governing bodies rules and regulations not
inconsistent with law for the distribution and sale of alcoholic liquor throughout
the state;

(5) To inspect or cause to be inspected any premises where alcoholic
liquor is manufactured, distributed, or sold and, when sold on unlicensed
premises or on any premises in violation of law, to bring an action to enjoin
the use of the property for such purpose;

(6) To hear and determine appeals from orders of a local governing body
in accordance with the act;

(7) To conduct or cause to be conducted an audit to inspect any licensee's
records and books;

(8) In the conduct of any hearing or audit authorized to be held by
the commission (a) to examine or cause to be examined, under oath, any licensee
and to examine or cause to be examined the books and records of such licensee,
(b) to hear testimony and take proof material for its information in the discharge
of its duties under the act, and (c) to administer or cause to be administered
oaths;

(9) To investigate the administration of laws in relation to alcoholic
liquor in this and other states and to recommend to the Governor and through
him or her to the Legislature amendments to the act; and

(10) To receive, account for, and remit to the State Treasurer state
license fees and taxes provided for in the act.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 16, p. 382;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-316;

R.S.1943, § 53-117;

Laws 1959, c. 245, § 1, p. 842;

Laws 1965, c. 318, § 4, p. 891;

Laws 1967, c. 332, § 1, p. 879;

Laws 1974, LB 681, § 4;

Laws 1980, LB 848, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 15;

Laws 1988, LB 1089, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 781, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 183, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 267, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 485, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB579, § 1.
September 6, 2013
In the absence of a violation of a statute or valid regulation of the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission, the commission has no authority to cancel a liquor license. Jetter v. Nebraska Liquor Control Commission, 204 Neb. 431, 283 N.W.2d 5 (1979).

Cited in making comparison of powers and duties of Liquor Control Commission with those of heads of executive departments. State ex rel. Johnson v. Chase, 147 Neb. 758, 25 N.W.2d 1 (1946).

Funds collected as state license fees are properly distributed for use of all school districts within state and should not be paid over to counties in which liquor licenses are granted. School District of Omaha v. Gass, 131 Neb. 312, 267 N.W. 528 (1936).